test/src/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - čáhppesoasus: # VIELG Attr + MALISLONG
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Nom: [čáhppesoasus, čáhppes-oasus]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Gen: [čáhppesossosa, čáhppes-ossosa]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Acc: [čáhppesossosa, čáhppes-ossosa]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Loc: [čáhppesossosis, čáhppes-ossosis]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Ill: [čáhppesossosii, čáhppes-ossosii]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Com: [čáhppesossosiin, čáhppes-ossosiin]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Nom: [čáhppesossosat, čáhppes-ossosat]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Gen: [čáhppesossosiid, čáhppes-ossosiid]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Acc: [čáhppesossosiid, čáhppes-ossosiid]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Loc: [čáhppesossosiin, čáhppes-ossosiin]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Ill: [čáhppesossosiidda, čáhppes-ossosiidda]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Com: [čáhppesossosiiguin, čáhppes-ossosiiguin]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Ess: [čáhppesoasusin, čáhppes-oasusin]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [čáhppesossosaš, čáhppes-ossosaš]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [čáhppesossosaččaš, čáhppes-ossosaččaš]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [čáhppesoasusheapme, čáhppes-oasusheapme]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [čáhppesoasuslaš, čáhppes-oasuslaš]


  Noun - viežžanolmmoš : # BOAHTINTV SgCmp + FALIS
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Nom: [viežžanolmmoš, viežžan-olmmoš]
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Loc: [viežžanolbmos, viežžan-olbmos]
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Ill: [viežžanolbmui, viežžan-olbmui]

  Noun - uksageahči : # GOAHTI-A SgNomCmp + AIGI
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: [uksageahči, uksa-geahči]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: [uksageažis, uksa-geažis]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: [uksageahčái, uksa-geahčái]

  Noun - uvssageahči : # GOAHTI-A SgGenCmp + AIGI
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: [uvssageahči, uvssa-geahči]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: [uvssageažis, uvssa-geažis]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: [uvssageahčái, uvssa-geahčái]

  Noun - uvssaidgeahči : # GOAHTI-A PlGenCmp + AIGI
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: [uvssaidgeahči, uvssaid-geahči]
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: [uvssaidgeažis, uvssaid-geažis]
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: [uvssaidgeahčái, uvssaid-geahčái]

  Noun - niibedilli : # GOAHTI-I SgNomCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibedilli, niibe-dilli]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibedilis, niibe-dilis]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibedillái, niibe-dillái]


  Noun - niibbidilli : # GOAHTI-I SgGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibbidilli, niibbedilli, niibbi-dilli, niibbe-dilli]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibbidilis, niibbedilis, niibbi-dilis, niibbe-dilis]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibbidillái, niibbedillái, niibbi-dillái, niibbe-dillái]

  Noun - niibbiiddilli : # GOAHTI-I PlGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibbiiddilli, niibbiid-dilli]
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibbiiddilis, niibbiid-dilis]
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibbiiddillái, niibbiid-dillái]
